distros/T/Text-Hunspell-FFI/t/test.aff
AM 7
AM po:noun ts:NOM
AM po:noun ts:ABL
AM po:noun ts:DAT
AM po:noun ts:ACC
AM po:adj ts:NOM
AM po:noun ts:NOM al:lovak
AM is:ABL
SET UTF-8
KEY öüó|qwertzuiopőú|asdfghjkléáű|íyxcvbnm        
TRY íóútaeslzánorhgkiédmyőpvöbucfjüűxwq-.à        
SFX A Y 4
SFX A 0 i . 5
SFX A 0 t . 4
SFX A 0 nak . 3
SFX A 0 tól . 7
SFX B Y 4
SFX B 0 i . 5
SFX B 0 ot . 4
SFX B 0 nak . 3
SFX B 0 tól . 7
